Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 7.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2935
Special members' meetings.

(1) Special members' meetings shall be called:

(a) As provided in the articles of organization or bylaws;

(b) By a majority vote of the board of directors;

(c) By demand in a record signed by members holding at least twenty percent of the votes of any class or group entitled to be cast on the matter that is the purpose of the meeting; or

(d) By demand in a record signed by members holding at least twenty percent of all votes entitled to be cast on the matter that is the purpose of the meeting.

(2) Any voting member may withdraw its demand under this section before the receipt by the limited cooperative association of demands sufficient to require a special members' meeting.

(3) A special members' meeting may be held in or out of this state at the place stated in the articles of organization or bylaws or by the board of directors in accordance with the articles of organization or bylaws.

(4) Only affairs within the purpose or purposes stated pursuant to subsection (2) of section 21-2965 may be conducted at a special members' meeting.

(5) Unless otherwise provided by the articles of organization or bylaws, the presiding officer of the meeting shall be designated by the board of directors.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 35;

Laws 2008, LB848, § 7.